Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202637-415
Lifetime fur-harvesting, fishing, hunting, or combination permit; fees; replacement; rules and regulations.

(1) The commission may issue to any Nebraska resident a lifetime fur-harvesting, fishing, hunting, or combination hunting and fishing permit upon application and payment of the appropriate fee. The fee for a resident lifetime fur-harvesting or hunting permit shall not exceed twenty times the annual fee for such permit, as such fees are established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327. The fee for a resident lifetime fishing or combination hunting and fishing permit shall not exceed twenty times the annual fee for such permit plus the cost of a lifetime aquatic habitat stamp, as such fees are established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327. Payment of the fee shall be made in a lump sum at the time of application.

(2) A resident lifetime permit shall not be made invalid by reason of the holder subsequently residing outside the state.

(3) The commission may issue to any nonresident a lifetime fishing, hunting, or combination hunting and fishing permit upon application and payment of the appropriate fee. The fee for a nonresident lifetime hunting permit shall not exceed twenty times the annual fee for such permit, as such fees are established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327. The fee for a nonresident lifetime fishing or combination hunting and fishing permit shall not exceed twenty times the annual fee for such permit plus the cost of a lifetime aquatic habitat stamp, as such fees are established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327. Payment of the fee shall be made in a lump sum at the time of application.

(4) A replacement resident or nonresident lifetime permit may be issued if the original has been lost or destroyed for no additional fee. This subsection applies only to a paper permit and not a commemorative brass plate permit.

(5) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section and sections 37-416 and 37-417. Such rules and regulations may include, but need not be limited to, establishing fees which vary based on the age of the applicant.

Laws 1983, LB 173, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-202.01;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 125;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 24;

Laws 2001, LB 111, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 306, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 162, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB1162, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 8;

Laws 2016, LB745, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB287, § 8;

Laws 2026, LB979, § 8.
July 18, 2026